src/fst/morphology/incoming/resplit/verb_suffixes.lexc
!! Verb suffixation

LEXICON VAI
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@+VAI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@+VAI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VAI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VII
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@+VII:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@+VII:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VII_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTI
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@+VTI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@+VTI:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTI_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VTA
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@+VTA:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NA@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@+VTA:@R.pos.NOUN@@P.class.NI@    VERB_DER_NOM_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@  VTA_DERIVATION ;

LEXICON VAI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus:@R.pos.VERB@%>áttsi                            VTA "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@+VAI+Der/Caus2:@R.pos.VERB@%>pi                              VTA "weight: 10" ; ! Rare, give low weight
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VAI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@+VAI+Accomp:@R.pos.VERB@@R.accomp.A@%>m	         VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ; ! -> VTA?

LEXICON VII_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VII:@R.pos.VERB@0		VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VTI_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTI:@R.pos.VERB@0                                           VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo  VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>omo VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTI+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o   VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;

LEXICON VTA_DERIVATION
@R.pos.VERB@+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@0                        VTA_SUFFIXES ;
!@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>mo         VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>%^BNFomo        VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@+VTA+Der/Bnf+VTA:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VTA@%>o          VTA_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rflx+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>ohsi      VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>%^RCPRotsiiyi   VAI_SUFFIXES "weight: 10" ;
!@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@+VTA+Der/Rcpr+VAI:@R.pos.VERB@@P.class.VAI@%>tsiiyi    VAI_SUFFIXES ;

! BELOW ARE THE VAI SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON VAI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@ IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksiwa ENCLITICS ; ! Sometimes, we end up with a -wa suffix following this interrogative
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawayi ENCLITICS ; ! Sometimes, we end up with a -yi suffix following this interrogative
! Singular INDEPENDENT
!@R.person.NULL@:@R.person.NULL@0   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@0   	ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@0   		ANIM_INTERR ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaana  ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaan  ANIM_INTERR ;	! Frantz 2017 p. 25 footnote 6
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'pa	 ANIM_INTERR ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'p	 ANIM_INTERR ;	! Frantz 2017 p. 25 footnote 6
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawa	 ANIM_INTERR ;  	
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>hsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hsinnaana  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>hsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>iniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+2Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>iniki   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+1Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>innaaniki  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>inoainiki ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+2Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>o'ki 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>htopi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopini   ENCLITICS ;	
! Plural UNREAL
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaanopi  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>hpoaawopi 	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>wahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;   
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopiyini    ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES
! Singular IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Sg:@R.person.IMP@%>t	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural IMPERATIVE
@R.person.IMP@+2Pl:@R.person.IMP@%>k	ENCLITICS ;

! BELOW ARE THE VII SUFFIXES

LEXICON VII_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@ INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@ CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@ SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@ UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES ;

LEXICON INDEP_VII_SUFFIXES
! Inanimate Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>waistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
!@R.person.NULL@ ENCLITICS ; ! removed
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi		ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Sg:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.OT@+%0Pl:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	

LEXICON SUBJ_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>si   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural SUBJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>si			ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON UNREAL_VII_SUFFIXES
! Singular UNREAL
@R.person.NULL@+%0Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopi	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural UNREAL  
@R.person.NULL@+%0Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>wahtopiyi	ENCLITICS ;

! BELOW ARE THE VTI SUFFIXES 

LEXICON VTI_SUFFIXES
@R.mode.IND@+Ind:@R.mode.IND@	INDEP_VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.CON@+Cnj:@R.mode.CON@	CONJ_VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@R.mode.SUB@	SUBJ_VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IRR@+Irr:@R.mode.IRR@	UNREAL_VTI_SUFFIXES ;
@R.mode.IMP@+Imp:@R.mode.IMP@	IMP_VTI_SUFFIXES ;

! Objects are included because Frantz says that -wa and -yi suffixes are only added to 1 and 2 forms in the independent.
! Just a warning about interrogatives. According to Frantz, there seems to be a lot of variability as to how speakers form
! questions. Some use the interrogrative endings seens here, others don't, and speakers may choose to use them or not.

LEXICON INDEP_VTI_SUFFIXES
! Inanimate interrogatives Singular Object
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>hpaatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>hpaatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>maatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>minaatsiksi ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnanaatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawaatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>'paatsiksi ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>miaatsiksi ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0SgO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>miaatsiksi ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
! Inanimate interrogatives Plural Object
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>hpaistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>hpaistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>maistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>minaistsaawa ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnanaistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawaistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>'paistsaawa ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>miaistsaawa ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO+Interr:@R.person.NULL@%>miaistsaawa ENCLITICS ; ! This is unattested
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>hpa   		ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>hpa   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>hpi   		ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>hpi   		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>ma		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>mini   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaana  ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>'pa	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>hpinnaani  ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>'pi	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaawa	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>hpoaayi	 ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mi		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>mi   	ENCLITICS ;

LEXICON CONJ_VTI_SUFFIXES
! Singular CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>hsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ; 
@R.person.KI@+2Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>hsi  	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.OT@+3Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.OT@%>hsi 		ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi   	ENCLITICS ;
! Plural CONJUNCTIVE
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NI@%>hsinnaani  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.KI@%>hsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0SgO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NI@+1Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NI@%>hsinnaani  ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi 	 ENCLITICS ;
@R.person.KI@+2Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.KI@%>hsoaayi	 ENCLITICS ;  
@R.person.OT@+3Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.OT@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;	
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl+%0PlO:@R.person.NULL@%>hsi	ENCLITICS ;
